California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(v) “Nonminor dependent” means, on and after January 1, 2012, a foster child, as described in Section 675(8)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code under the federal Social Security Act who is a current dependent child or ward of the juvenile court, or who is a nonminor under the transition jurisdiction of the juvenile court, as described in Section 450, and who satisfies all of the following criteria:

(1) The nonminor dependent has attained 18 years of age while under an order of foster care placement by the juvenile court, and is not more than 19 years of age on or after January 1, 2012, not more than 20 years of age on or after January 1, 2013, or not more than 21 years of age on or after January 1, 2014, and as described in Section 10103.5.

(2) The nonminor dependent is in foster care under the placement and care responsibility of the county welfare department, county probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1.

(3) The nonminor dependent has a transitional independent living case plan pursuant to Section 475(8) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 675(8)), as contained in the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351), as described in Section 11403.

(w) “Supervised independent living placement” means, on and after January 1, 2012, an independent supervised setting in which the nonminor dependent is living independently, pursuant to Section 472(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.
 Sec. 672(c)).

(x) “Supervised independent living setting,” pursuant to Section 472(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 672(c)), includes all of the following:

(1) A supervised independent living placement, as defined in subdivision (w), and as specified in a nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan.

(2) A transitional housing unit in which a host family lives with a nonminor dependent who is a participant of a Transitional Housing Placement program, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1559.110 of the Health and Safety Code, including an apartment, single-family dwelling, or condominium owned, rented, or leased by the host family, with supervised transitional housing services provided by
 the licensed transitional housing placement provider.

(3) A residential housing unit certified by the transitional housing placement provider operating a Transitional Housing Placement program for nonminor dependents, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16522.1.

(4) A transitional
 living setting approved by the county to support youth who are entering or reentering foster care or transitioning between placements. The short-term independent living setting shall not include a youth homelessness prevention center or an adult homeless shelter. A transitional living setting approved by the county for purposes of this paragraph is not subject to licensing pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (l) of Section 1505 of the Health and Safety Code.

(y) “Transitional independent living case plan” means, on or after January 1, 2012, a child’s case plan submitted for the last review hearing held before the child reaches 18 years of age or the nonminor dependent’s case plan, updated every six months, that describes the goals and objectives of how the nonminor will make progress in the transition to living independently and assume incremental responsibility for adult decisionmaking, the collaborative efforts between the nonminor and
 the social worker, probation officer, or Indian tribal placing entity and the supportive services as described in the transitional independent living plan (TILP) to ensure active and meaningful participation in one or more of the eligibility criteria described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, the nonminor’s appropriate supervised placement setting, and the nonminor’s permanent plan for transition to living independently, which includes maintaining or obtaining permanent connections to caring and committed adults, as set forth in paragraph (16) of subdivision (f) of Section 16501.1.

(z) “Voluntary reentry agreement” means a written voluntary agreement between a former dependent child or ward or a former nonminor dependent, who has had juvenile court jurisdiction terminated pursuant to Section 391, 452, or 607.2,
 or between a nonminor dependent who has not signed a voluntary reentry agreement after attaining 18 years of age and for whom a petition will be filed pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 388, and the county welfare or probation department or tribal placing entity that documents the nonminor’s desire and willingness to reenter foster care, to be placed in a supervised setting under the placement and care responsibility of the placing agency, the nonminor’s desire, willingness, and ability to immediately participate in one or more of the conditions of paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, the nonminor’s agreement to work collaboratively with the placing agency to develop their transitional independent living case plan within 60 days of reentry, if not previously completed, the nonminor’s agreement to report any changes of
 circumstances relevant to continued eligibility for foster care payments, and (1) the nonminor’s agreement to participate in the filing of a petition for juvenile court jurisdiction as a nonminor dependent pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 within 15 judicial days of the signing of the agreement and the placing agency’s efforts and supportive services to assist the nonminor in the reentry process, (2) if the nonminor meets the definition of a nonminor former dependent or ward, as described in subdivision (aa), the nonminor’s agreement to return to the care and support of their former juvenile court-appointed guardian and meet the eligibility criteria for AFDC-FC pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section
 11405, or (3) the nonminor dependent’s agreement to participate in the filing of a petition pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 388.

(aa) “Nonminor former dependent or ward” means, on and after January 1, 2012, either of the following:

(1) A nonminor who reached 18 years of age while subject to an order for foster care placement, and for whom dependency, delinquency, or transition jurisdiction has been terminated, and who is still under the general jurisdiction of the court.

(2) A nonminor who is over 18 years of age and, while a minor, was a dependent child or ward of the juvenile court when the guardianship was established pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26, or subdivision (d) of Section 728, and the juvenile court dependency or wardship was dismissed following the
 establishment of the guardianship.

(ab) “Youth homelessness prevention center” means a type of group home, as defined in paragraph (14) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, that is not an eligible placement option under Sections 319, 361.2, 450, and 727, and that is not eligible for AFDC-FC funding pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11402 or Section 11462.

(ac) “Transition dependent” is a minor between 17 years and five months and 18 years of age who is subject to the court’s transition jurisdiction under Section 450.

(ad) “Short-term residential therapeutic program” means a nondetention, licensed community care facility, as defined in paragraph (18) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, that provides an integrated program of specialized and intensive care
 and supervision, services and supports, and treatment for the child or youth, when the child’s or youth’s case plan specifies the need for, nature of, and anticipated duration of this specialized treatment. Short-term residential therapeutic programs shall be organized and operated on a nonprofit basis.

(ae) “Resource family” means an approved caregiver, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 16519.5.

(af) “Core services” means services, made available to children, youth, and nonminor dependents either directly or secured through agreement with other agencies,
 that are trauma informed and culturally relevant, as specified in Sections 11462 and 11463.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 702, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 592)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.

Aid in the form of AFDC-FC shall be provided under this chapter on behalf of any child under 18 years of age, and to any nonminor dependent who meets the conditions of any of the following subdivisions:

(a) The child has been relinquished, for purposes of adoption, to a licensed adoption agency, or the department, or the parental rights of either or both of the child’s parents have been terminated after an action under the Family Code has been brought by a licensed adoption agency or the department, provided that the licensed adoption agency or the department, if responsible for placement and care, provides to those children all services as required by the department to children in foster
 care.

(b) The child has been removed from the physical custody of the child’s parent, relative, or guardian as a result of a voluntary placement agreement or a judicial determination that continuance in the home would be contrary to the child’s welfare and that, if the child was placed in foster care, reasonable efforts were made, consistent with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 4, to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child’s home and to make it possible for the child to return to the child’s home, and any of the following applies:

(1) The child has been adjudged a dependent child of the court on the grounds that the child is a person described by Section 300.

(2) The child has been
 adjudged a ward of the court on the grounds that the child is a person described by Sections 601 and 602, or the child or nonminor is under the transition jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 450.

(3) The child has been detained under a court order, pursuant to Section 319 or 636, that remains in effect.

(4) The child’s or nonminor’s dependency jurisdiction, or transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 450, has resumed pursuant to Section 387, or subdivision (a), (e), or (f) of Section 388.

(c) The child has been voluntarily placed by the child’s parent or guardian pursuant to Section 11401.1.

(d) The child is living in the home of a
 nonrelated legal guardian, or the nonminor is living in the home of a former nonrelated legal guardian.

(e) The child is a nonminor dependent who is placed pursuant to a mutual agreement as set forth in subdivision (u) of Section 11400, under the placement and care responsibility of the county child welfare services department, an Indian tribe that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1, or the county probation department, or the child is a nonminor dependent reentering foster care placement pursuant to a voluntary agreement, as set forth in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.

(f) The child has been placed in foster care consistent with the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.). Sections 11402, 11404, and 11405 shall not be
 construed as limiting payments to an Indian child, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 224.1 and Section 1903 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, placed in accordance with that act and the provisions of Section 361.31.

(g) To be eligible for federal financial participation, the conditions described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) shall be satisfied:

(1) (A) The child meets the conditions of subdivision (b).

(B) The child has been deprived of parental support or care for any of the reasons set forth in Section 11250.

(C) The child has been removed from the home of a relative as defined in Section 233.90(c)(1) of
 Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended.

(D) The requirements of Sections 671 and 672 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended, have been met.

(2) (A) The child meets the requirements of subdivision (h).

(B) The requirements of Sections 671 and 672 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended, have been met.

(C) This paragraph shall be implemented only if federal financial participation is available for the children described in this paragraph.

(3) (A) The child has been removed from the custody of the child’s parent, relative, or
 guardian as a result of a voluntary placement agreement or a judicial determination that continuance in the home would be contrary to the child’s welfare and that, if the child was placed in foster care, reasonable efforts were made, consistent with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 4, to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child’s home and to make it possible for the child to return to the child’s home, or the child is a nonminor dependent who satisfies the removal criteria in Section 472(a)(2)(A)(i) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 672 (a)(2)(A)(i)) and agrees to the placement and care responsibility of the placing agency by signing the voluntary reentry agreement, as set forth in subdivision (z) of Section 11400, and any of the following applies:

(i) The child has been adjudged
 a dependent child of the court on the grounds that the child is a person described by Section 300.

(ii) The child has been adjudged a ward of the court on the grounds that the child is a person described by Sections 601 and 602 or the child or nonminor is under the transition jurisdiction of the juvenile court, pursuant to Section 450.

(iii) The child has been detained under a court order, pursuant to Section 319 or 636, that remains in effect.

(iv) The child’s or nonminor’s dependency jurisdiction, or transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 450, has resumed pursuant to Section 387, or subdivision (a), (e), or (f) of Section 388.

(B) The child has been
 placed in an eligible foster care placement, as set forth in Section 11402.

(C) The requirements of Sections 671 and 672 of Title 42 of the United States Code have been satisfied.

(D) This paragraph shall be implemented only if federal financial participation is available for the children described in this paragraph.

(4) With respect to a nonminor dependent, in addition to meeting the conditions specified in paragraph (1), the requirements of Section 675(8)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code have been satisfied. With respect to a former nonminor dependent who reenters foster care placement by signing the voluntary reentry agreement, as set forth in subdivision (z) of Section 11400, the requirements for
 AFDC-FC eligibility of Section 672(a)(3)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code are satisfied based on the nonminor’s status as a child-only case, without regard to the parents, legal guardians, or others in the assistance unit in the home from which the nonminor was originally removed.

(h) The child meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The child has been adjudged to be a dependent child or ward of the court on the grounds that the child is a person described in Section 300, 601, or 602.

(2) The child’s parent also has been adjudged to be a dependent child or nonminor dependent of the court on the grounds that the child’s parent is a person described by Section 300, 450, 601, or 602 and is receiving benefits under
 this chapter.

(3) The child is placed in the same licensed or approved foster care facility in which the child’s parent is placed and the child’s parent is receiving reunification services with respect to that child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 28.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.05.

The department shall amend the foster care state plan required under Subtitle IV-E (commencing with Section 470 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.)), to extend benefits under this article, commencing January 1, 2012, to an individual who is in foster care under the responsibility of the state, or with respect to whom an adoption assistance agreement or a kinship guardianship assistance agreement is in effect, in accordance with the federal Fostering
 Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 40.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.1.

(a) Otherwise eligible children placed voluntarily prior to January 1, 1981, may remain eligible for AFDC-FC payments.

(b) Beginning on January 1, 1982, AFDC-FC payments for children placed voluntarily on or after January 1, 1981, shall be limited to a period of up to 180 days under conditions specified by departmental regulations, and may
 be extended an additional six months pursuant to Section 16507.3 and departmental regulations.

(c) On and after January 1, 2012, AFDC-FC payments for nonminor dependents, who reentered foster care placement by signing a voluntary reentry agreement pursuant to subdivision (z) of Section 11400, shall be limited to a period not to exceed 180 days. The county child welfare services department or probation department shall file a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 within 15 judicial days of the signing of the agreement to have the nonminor declared a nonminor dependent of the juvenile court in that reentry and remaining in foster care is in the best interests of the nonminor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 459, Sec. 31.   (AB 212)   Effective October 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.2.

AFDC-FC shall be paid to an otherwise eligible child in a voluntary placement in a demonstration county for a period not to exceed six months, with a maximum extension of an additional six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1166, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.4.

A child living with his or her parent who is a minor or, on and after January 1, 2012, a nonminor dependent and a recipient of AFDC-FC benefits shall be deemed a child with respect to whom AFDC-FC payments are made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 42.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.5.

(a) The county shall review the child’s or nonminor dependent’s payment amount annually. The review shall include an examination of any circumstances of a foster child or nonminor dependent that are subject to change and could affect the child’s or nonminor dependent’s potential eligibility or payment amount, including, but not limited to, authority for placement, eligible facility, and age.

(b) Consistent with federal law, any income and resources of the foster child or nonminor dependent obtained after the initial eligibility determination shall not be used to redetermine eligibility during a single foster care episode.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 237, Sec. 2.   (AB 2477)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.6.

At the time of determining eligibility for AFDC-FC payments, the county shall also determine whether the child is currently in receipt of benefits pursuant to Title II or Title XVI of the Social Security Act. If so, the county shall apply to become the child’s representative payee, as appropriate, during the time the child is placed in foster care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 641, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.

In order to be eligible for AFDC-FC, a child or nonminor dependent shall be placed in one of the following:

(a) Before January 1, 2021:

(1) The approved home of a relative, provided the child or youth is otherwise eligible for federal financial participation in the AFDC-FC payment.

(2) The approved home of a nonrelative extended family member, as described in Section 362.7.

(3) The licensed family home of a nonrelative.

(b) The approved home of a resource family, as defined in Section 16519.5, if either of the following is
 true:

(1) The caregiver is a nonrelative.

(2) The caregiver is a relative, and the child or youth is otherwise eligible for federal financial participation in the AFDC-FC payment.

(c) A small family home, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) A housing unit, as described in Section 1559.110 of the Health and Safety Code, certified by a licensed transitional housing placement provider, as defined in paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code and subdivision (r) of Section 11400.

(e) An approved supervised independent living setting for nonminor dependents, as described in subdivision (x) of Section 11400.

(f) A licensed foster family agency, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 11400 and paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, for placement into a certified or approved home used exclusively by the foster family agency.

(g) A short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined in subdivision (ad) of Section 11400 and paragraph (18) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) An out-of-state residential facility that meets the statutory requirements for placing a child or youth in an out-of-state residential facility, provided that the placement worker documents that the requirements of Section 7911.1 of the Family Code have been met, including, but not limited to, the child-specific certification of the facility by the department.

(i) A community treatment facility, as defined in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, and as set forth in Article 5 (commencing with Section 4094) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 4.

(j) A community care facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and vendored by a regional center pursuant to Section 56004 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, unless the facility is a group home for children with special health care needs, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section
 4684.50 of this code.

(k) The home of a nonrelated legal guardian or the home of a former nonrelated legal guardian if the guardianship of a child or youth who is otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC has been dismissed due to the child or youth attaining 18 years of age.

(l) A dormitory or other designated housing of a postsecondary educational institution in which a minor dependent who is enrolled at the postsecondary educational institution is living independently, as described in Section 11402.7.

(m) On or after April 1, 2021, a residential family-based treatment facility for substance abuse, in which an eligible child is placed with a parent in treatment, licensed pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 11834.01) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and the placement and facility
 meets all of the requirements of subdivision (j) of Section 672 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(n) A tribally approved home, as defined in Section 224.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 18.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.005.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that implementation of Part IV of the federal Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018 (Public Law 115-123) affects eligibility for Title IV-E federal financial participation for certain placement settings available to children and youth in foster care in California.

(b) On or before October 1, 2021, the State Department of Social Services shall clarify the conditions under which Title IV-E federal financial participation is available for each AFDC-FC eligible placement enumerated in Section 11402.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1
 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(d) The State Department of Health Care Services may provide guidance on whether federal financial participation is available for Medi-Cal services that intersect with the implementation of Part IV of the federal Family First Prevention Services Act. Medi-Cal services shall only be claimed to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and medical assistance federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the
 State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific portions this act affecting the provision of Medi-Cal services by means of plan or all-county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(e) The State Department of Health Care Services may submit a Medicaid state plan amendment, waiver request, or both, in order to maximize federal financial participation in implementing this section. The State Department of Health Care Services may, in submitting a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver request, consult with the State Department of Social Services, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and the County Welfare Directors Association of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 37.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.1.

For purposes of Section 11402, “eligible for federal financial participation” means that the payment is consistent with an approved state plan under Sections 671 and following of Title 42 of the United States Code, authorizing federal financial participation in the payment. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, until and unless federal financial participation is obtained, no payment of AFDC-FC may be made from either state or county funds on behalf of a child determined to be eligible for AFDC-FC solely as a result of the decision of the California Court of
 Appeal in Land v. Anderson (1997) 55 Cal.App.4th 89.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 22.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.2.

(a) Recognizing that transitions to independence involve self-initiated changes in placements, it is the intent of the Legislature that regulations developed regarding the approval of the supervised independent living setting, as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, shall ensure continuity of placement and payment while the nonminor dependent is awaiting approval of their new supervised independent living setting, in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1524 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A county may elect to complete an inspection of a supervised independent living placement to ensure that it meets health and safety standards through methods
 other than an in-person visit, including, but not limited to, videoconferencing and telephone calls that include pictures of the living space, and may, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, temporarily approve the supervised independent living placement pending the submission of required forms by the nonminor dependent, based on the nonminor dependent’s agreement that the forms will be submitted.

(c) A county may elect to certify that a supervised independent living placement meets health and safety standards once every 12 months, as long as the county has no reason to believe that the health and safety conditions of the housing option have changed. This subdivision does not require that individual placements be certified every 12 months if the same youth remains continuously in the placement.

(d) A county may elect to authorize a licensed transitional housing placement provider to provide supportive services to assist the nonminor dependent in their supervised independent living setting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 702, Sec. 4.   (AB 592)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.4.

(a) Subject to the conditions set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c), and notwithstanding any other provision of law, with respect to an approved home of a relative or nonrelative extended family member for which an annual visit to ensure the quality of care provided is pending, the relative or nonrelative extended family member home’s approval shall remain in full force and effect. Payment to the relative or nonrelative extended family member provider shall not be delayed or terminated solely due to late completion of the annual visit to ensure the quality of care provided.

(b) The frequency of required visits to ensure the quality of care provided shall not be less than the frequency of visits for licensed foster family
 homes as specified in Section 1534 of the Health and Safety Code. If late completion of an annual visit occurs, under no circumstances shall the county visit an approved home of a relative or nonrelative extended family member less than once every 24 months.

(c) The frequency of required visits to ensure the quality of care provided shall be subject to state plan approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 29, Sec. 71.   (SB 855)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.5.

(a) The federal government has provided the state the option of including in its state plan children placed in public child care institutions. Therefore, notwithstanding Section 11402 and subject to Section 15200.5, it is the intent of the Legislature that a child who is otherwise eligible for federal financial participation in the AFDC-FC payment may be eligible for aid under the provisions of this chapter when the child is placed in a public child care institution. Payment under the provisions of this section cannot exceed 30 days, except
 as provided in subdivision (b). This provision is effective only if and during such federal fiscal year when no restriction, as defined by the department, on federal matching for AFDC-FC payments exists. Pursuant to this section, the county shall request reimbursement at the close of the federal fiscal year. As used in this section, “public child care institution” means a nondetention facility which has been licensed in accordance with the Community Care Facilities Act, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and which has a licensed capacity not exceeding 25 children.

(b) When a child is hard to place, as defined in departmental regulations, and when the child is not placed in an emergency shelter, payment may be made under this section for a period not exceeding 90 days.

(c) Upon notification from the federal government that the
 restrictions on federal matching specified in subdivision (a) do not exist, the department shall amend the state plan to authorize federal financial participation to a county or counties operating a public child care institution with a licensed capacity exceeding 25 children.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (c), “public child care institution” includes only those facilities that meet all of the following requirements:

(1) It is temporary shelter care facility, as defined in Section 1530.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), it has a licensed capacity that does not exceed 200 children.

(B) A facility in Orange County may have a licensed capacity of not more than 236
 children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 958, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.6.

(a) The federal government has provided the state with the option of including in its state plan children placed in a private facility operated on a for-profit basis.

(b) For children for whom the county placing agency has exhausted all other placement options, notwithstanding subdivision (h) of Section 11400 and subject to Section 15200.5,
 a child who is otherwise eligible for federal financial participation in the AFDC-FC payment shall be eligible for aid under this chapter when the child is placed in a for-profit child care institution and meets all of the following criteria, which shall be clearly documented in the county welfare department case file:

(1) The child has extraordinary and unusual special behavioral or medical needs that make the child difficult to place, including, but not limited to, being medically fragile, brittle diabetic, having severe head injuries, a dual diagnosis of mental illness and substance abuse or a dual diagnosis of developmental delay and mental illness.

(2) No other comparable private nonprofit facility or public licensed residential care home exists in the state that is willing to accept placement and is capable of meeting the child’s extraordinary special needs.

(3) The county placing agency has demonstrated that no other alternate placement option exists for the child.

(4) The child has a developmental disability and is eligible for both federal AFDC-FC payments and for regional center services.

(c) Federal financial participation shall be provided pursuant to Section 11402 for children described in subdivision (a) subject to all of the following conditions, which shall be clearly documented in the county welfare department case file.

(1) The county placing agency enters into a performance-based placement agreement with the for-profit facility to ensure the facility is providing services to improve the safety, permanency, and well-being outcomes of the placed children pursuant to Section 10601.2.

(2) The county placing agency will require the facility to ensure placement in the child’s community to the degree possible to enhance ongoing connections with the child’s family and to promote the establishment of lifelong connections with committed adults.

(3) The county placing agency monitors and reviews the facility’s outcome performance indicators every six months.

(4) In no event shall federal financial participation in this placement exceed a 12-month period.

(5) Payments made under this section shall not be made on behalf of any more than five children in a county at any one time.

(6) Payments made under this section shall be made pursuant to Sections 4684 and 11464, and only to a
 group home that is an approved vendor of a regional center.

(d) This section shall be implemented only during a federal fiscal year in which the department determines that no restriction on federal matching AFDC-FC payment exists.

(e) As used in this section, “child care institution” means a nondetention facility that has been licensed in accordance with the California Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), and that has a licensed capacity not exceeding 25 children.

(f) The county placing agency shall review and report to the juvenile court at every six-month case plan update if this placement remains appropriate and necessary and what the plan is for discharge to a less restrictive placement.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) or any other provision of law, this section shall not be implemented before July 1, 2010.

(h) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 82.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a minor dependent at least 16 years of age who is otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC benefits, as described in Section 11401, may be eligible to receive his or her AFDC-FC payment directly, if all of the following conditions apply:

(1) The minor is enrolled in a postsecondary educational institution.

(2) The minor is living independently in a dormitory or other designated housing of the postsecondary educational institution.

(3) The placement is made pursuant to a supervised placement agreement and transitional independent living plan, as described in paragraph (16) of subdivision (g)
 of Section 16501.1.

(b) A minor receiving court-ordered reunification services shall not be eligible to live independently in postsecondary educational institutional housing pursuant to this section if the court finds that the placement would impede reunification efforts.

(c) Unless otherwise authorized by federal law, federal financial participation shall not be available for placements described in this section.

(d) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that payments received by a minor pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be counted as income by any public or private postsecondary educational institution in the state for the purposes of the minor’s financial aid determination.

(2) The California State University and the
 California Community Colleges shall not consider the payments described in subdivision (a) when determining eligibility for financial aid, as provided in Section 66021.5 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 710, Sec. 3.   (AB 766)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.9.

In order to receive funding on behalf of children receiving AFDC-FC, each provider, as defined in Section 11466, shall provide a full disclosure of all financial information related to its operation, including independent certification of the information provided, in a manner and format established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 61.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to exercise the option afforded states under Section 475(8) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 675(8)), and Section 473(a)(4) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 673(a)(4)) of the federal Social Security Act, as contained in the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351), to receive federal financial participation for nonminor dependents of the juvenile court who satisfy the conditions of subdivision (b), consistent with their transitional independent living case plan. Nonminor dependents are eligible to receive support until they reach 21 years of age, consistent with their transitional independent living case plan and as described in Section 10103.5. It is the intent of the Legislature, both at the time of initial determination of the nonminor dependent’s eligibility and throughout the time the nonminor
 dependent is eligible for aid pursuant to this section, that the social worker or probation officer or Indian tribal placing entity and the nonminor dependent shall work together to ensure the nonminor dependent’s ongoing eligibility. All case planning shall be a collaborative effort between the nonminor dependent and the social worker, probation officer, or Indian tribe, with the nonminor dependent assuming increasing levels of responsibility and independence.
